Louisiana, session 2026, HB1076.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
5 Section 1. R.S. 37:3718 is hereby repealed in its entirety.
DIGEST
The digest printed below was prepared by House Legislative Services. It constitutes no part
of the legislative instrument. The keyword, one-liner, abstract, and digest do not constitute
part of the law or proof or indicia of legislative intent. [R.S. 1:13(B) and 24:177(E)]
HB 1076 Engrossed 2026 Regular Session Muscarello
Abstract: Provides for the termination of the sunset provision for the La. Behavior Analyst
Board.
Present law creates the La. Behavior Analyst Board (board) with the La. Department of
Health.
Present law provides for the duties and powers of the board. Further provides for the
licensure of behavior analysts.
Present law terminates the provisions of present law on July 1, 2028.
Proposed law repeals present law.
(Repeals R.S. 37:3718)
Page 1 of 1